Utah statutes.
53A-10-107.   Deficiencies -- Remediation.
(1)  The person responsible for administering an educator's evaluation shall
give an educator whose performance is inadequate or in need of improvement a
written document clearly identifying:
(a)  deficiencies;
(b)  the available resources for improvement; and
(c)  a recommended course of action that will improve the educator's
performance.
(2)  The district shall provide the educator with reasonable assistance to
improve performance.
(3)  An educator is responsible for improving performance by using the
resources identified by the school district and demonstrating acceptable
levels of improvement in the designated areas of deficiencies.
(4) (a)  The person responsible for administering the evaluation of an
educator whose performance has been determined to be inadequate or in need of
improvement shall complete written evaluations and recommendations regarding
the educator at least 60 days before the end of the educator's contract school
year.
(b)  The final evaluation shall include only data previously considered and
discussed with the educator as required by Section 53A-10-106.5.
